Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB1186.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1770XC (2) 91 dg/ko S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 135B.3, Code 2025, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 135B.3 Licensure. 3 1. No A person or governmental unit, acting severally or 4 jointly with any other person or governmental unit shall not 5 establish, conduct, or maintain a hospital or rural emergency 6 hospital in this state without a license. 7 2. A license shall not be issued or renewed under this 8 chapter for an instrumentality of the government of the 9 Peopleâs Republic of China, an individual who is a citizen 10 of the Peopleâs Republic of China, or a business entity in 11 which a majority interest is owned directly or indirectly by 12 an instrumentality of the government of the Peopleâs Republic 13 of China, or an individual who is a citizen of the Peopleâs 14 Republic of China. 15 Sec. 2. Section 135C.6, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 16 to read as follows: 17 1. a. A person or governmental unit acting severally or 18 jointly with any other person or governmental unit shall not 19 establish or operate a health care facility in this state 20 without a license for the facility. 21 b. A supported community living service, as defined in 22 section 225C.21 , is not required to be licensed under this 23 chapter , but is subject to approval under section 225C.21 in 24 order to receive public funding. 25 c. A license shall not be issued or renewed under this 26 chapter for an instrumentality of the government of the 27 Peopleâs Republic of China, an individual who is a citizen 28 of the Peopleâs Republic of China, or a business entity in 29 which a majority interest is owned directly or indirectly by 30 an instrumentality of the government of the Peopleâs Republic 31 of China, or an individual who is a citizen of the Peopleâs 32 Republic of China. 33